Illinois, session 104th, HB3405.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-80-3 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/11-80-3)  (from Ch. 24, par. 11-80-3)7    Sec. 11-80-3. The corporate authorities of each 8municipality may prevent and remove from streets, ditches, and 9other municipal property encroachments and or obstructions, 10including, but not limited to, containers placed by motorists 11in a street or ditch or on other municipal property for the 12purpose of containing human waste upon the streets and other 13municipal property.14(Source: Laws 1961, p. 576.)